csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAIO.yaml
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawenaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [indadaawenaabaniin,indadaawenaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawenaawaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gidadaawenaawaabaniin,gidadaawenaawaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawenaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gidadaawenaabaniin,gidadaawenaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawenaawaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [odadaawenaawaabaniin,odadaawenaawaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0Sg: odadaaweninaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0Pl: [odadaaweninaabaniin,odadaaweninaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawenaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [odadaawenaabaniin,odadaawenaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: indadaaweminaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [indadaaweminaabaniin,indadaaweminaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gidadaaweminaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gidadaaweminaabaniin,gidadaaweminaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
